Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-837
Lottery contractor; perform contract in compliance with other laws; failure; effect.

Each lottery contractor shall perform its contract consistent with the laws of this state, federal laws, and the laws of the state or states in which such contractor is performing or producing, in whole or in part, any of the goods or services for which the division contracted. No contracts with any lottery contractor who fails to comply with such laws shall be entered into by the director or shall be enforceable by the contractor.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 37;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 56.